vi: Phù hợp với Barista: Phiên bản Barista; Dạng cô đặc; Thông thường; Khác
zh-TW: 咖啡師適用性: 咖啡師版; 濃縮液; 一般; 其他
pt-BR: Adequação para barista: Edição barista; Concentrado; Normal; Outros
de: Eignung als Barista: Barista-Edition; Konzentrat; Normal; Sonstige
fr: Adaptation à un usage de barista: Édition barista; Concentré; Classique; Autre
ro-RO: Adecvat pentru barista: Ediția barista; Concentrat; Obișnuit; Altele
it: Idoneità al ruolo di barista: Edizione barista; Concentrato; Classico; Altro
ru: Пригодность для бариста: Для бариста; Концентрат; Обычный; Другое
fi: Soveltuvuus kahvinvalmistukseen: Barista-versio; Tiiviste; Tavallinen; Muu
hu: Baristák általi alkalmazhatóság: Barista kiadás; Koncentrátum; Normál; Egyéb
lt-LT: Baristos tinkamumas: Baristų leidimas; Koncentratas; Įprastas; Kita
zh-CN: 咖啡师配方: 咖啡师版; 浓缩液; 常规版; 其他
hr-HR: Prikladnost za pjenjenje: Barista izdanje; Koncentrat; Obično; Ostalo
es: Aptitud para barista: Edición barista; Concentrado; Normal; Otro
sl-SI: Primernost za bariste: Izdaja Barista; Koncentrat; Navadno; Drugo
bg-BG: Подходящост за бариста: Бариста издание; Концентрат; Обикновен; Друго
el: Καταλληλότητα για barista: Έκδοση Barista; Συμπύκνωμα; Κανονικό; Άλλο
pl: Przydatność dla baristów: Barista Edition; Koncentrat; Standardowe; Inne
sv: Lämplighet för barista: Barista edition; Koncentrat; Vanlig; Övrigt
en: Barista suitability: Barista edition; Concentrate; Regular; Other
cs: Vhodnost pro baristy: Barista edice; Koncentrát; Běžné; Jiné
pt-PT: Aptidão para barista: Edição de barista; Concentrado; Normal; Outro
tr: Barista kullanımına uygunluk: Barista sürümü; Konsantre; Normal; Diğer
ko: 바리스타 적합성: 바리스타 에디션; 농축액; 일반; 기타
da: Egnethed til brug for baristaer: Barista-udgave; Koncentrat; Almindelig; Andet
th: ความเหมาะสมสำหรับบาริสต้า: ฉบับบาริสต้า; เข้มข้น; สูตรปกติ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Vhodnosť pre baristu: Edícia Barista; Koncentrát; Bežné; Iné
nb: Egnethet for baristaer: Barista-utgave; Konsentrat; Vanlig; Annet
ja: バリスタとしての適性: バリスタエディション; 濃縮; レギュラー; その他
nl: Barista geschiktheid: Barista-editie; Concentraat; Normaal; Overig